Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.045

Manufacturer's license—Fees—Display—Declaration of ownership and location—Penalties.

(1) The owner of each and every place of business which manufactures drugs shall pay a license fee to be determined by the secretary, and thereafter, on or before a date to be determined by the secretary, a fee to be determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280, for which the owner shall receive a license of location from the department, which shall entitle the owner to manufacture drugs at the location specified for the period ending on a date to be determined by the secretary, and each such owner shall at the time of payment of such fee file with the department, on a blank therefor provided, a declaration of ownership and location, which declaration of ownership and location so filed as aforesaid shall be deemed presumptive evidence of the ownership of such place of business mentioned therein. It shall be the duty of the owner to notify immediately the department of any change of location or ownership and to keep the license of location or the renewal thereof properly exhibited in such place of business.

(2) Failure to conform with this section is a misdemeanor, and each day that the failure continues is a separate offense.

(3) In event the license fee remains unpaid on the date due, no renewal or new license shall be issued except upon compliance with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2003 c 53 s 132; 1996 c 191 s 44; 1991 c 229 s 4; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 416; 1984 c 153 s 6; 1979 c 90 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 201 s 3; 1963 c 38 s 4; 1949 c 153 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10154-4. Formerly RCW 18.67.140.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 201: See note following RCW 18.64.040.